Maine, session 132, LD2055.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11154, sub-§16, as amended by PL 2025, c. 289, §2 and
affected by §3, is further amended to read:
16. Moose permit transfer; disabled veterans. A person who holds a valid moose
permit may transfer, in accordance with this subsection, that permit to a disabled veteran
who meets the eligibility and permit requirements under this section and section 10853,
subsection 4 and who is not otherwise prohibited from holding a moose permit. The
commissioner may authorize a permit holder to transfer the moose permit to a disabled
veteran identified by the permit holder or the permit holder may return the permit to the
department, which, in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner, shall provide
for the transfer of the permit to a disabled veteran. A transferor and a transferee of the
permit are subject to the elimination of any accumulated points under subsection 8 and the
transferee is subject to the eligibility period under subsection 5 that prohibits a transferee
that transfers a moose permit pursuant to this subsection from obtaining another moose
permit until the 4th calendar year after the issuance of the last permit. Rules adopted under
this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2‑A.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §12509, as amended by PL 2025, c. 343, §§5 to 7, is further
amended to read:
§12509. Permit to import live freshwater fish or eggs gametes
1. Permit required. Except as otherwise authorized pursuant to this Part, a person
may not introduce, import or transport any live fish or fish eggs gametes into the State or
receive or have in that person's possession fish or fish eggs gametes so introduced, imported
or transported without a valid permit issued under this section.
A person who violates this subsection commits a Class E crime, except that,
notwithstanding Title 17‑A, section 1704, the fine may not be less than $1,000 nor more
than $10,000.
Page 1 - 132LR2634(03)

2. Issuance. The commissioner may grant permits to introduce, import or transport
any live fish or fish eggs gametes into the State or to receive or have in possession fish or
fish eggs gametes so introduced, imported or transported if the commissioner determines
that the species does not pose an unreasonable risk to any species of fish or other organism
after evaluating fish health, habitat and population management issues. The commissioner
may not adopt rules or issue permits governing any aspect of either the commercial
aquaculture of Atlantic salmon when intended for use in commercial aquaculture in coastal
waters, or in land-based aquaculture facilities, or the Atlantic salmon restoration program.
3. Application. Importers shall, when requesting a permit issued pursuant to
subsection 2, provide the commissioner with the following information:
A. The number and species to be imported;
B. The name and address of the source;
C. A statement from a fish health inspector certified by the American Fisheries
Society, a fish pathologist certified by the American Fisheries Society or a licensed
accredited veterinarian, certifying that the fish or fish eggs gametes are from sources
that show no evidence of viral hemorrhagic septicemia, infectious pancreatic necrosis,
infectious hematopoietic necrosis, Myxosomo cerebralis or other diseases that may
threaten fish stocks within the State; and
D. Other professionally recognized tests or analyses, including evaluation of fish
health, habitat or population management issues that the commissioner may require by
rule to ensure that the species will not pose an unreasonable risk to any species of fish
or other organism.
4. Rules. The commissioner may adopt rules allowing the possession and importation
of certain species of tropical fish and goldfish without a permit, for aquarium purposes
only, if the commissioner determines that the species does not pose an unreasonable risk to
any species of fish or other organism after evaluating fish health, habitat and population
management issues. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules
as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §12510, as amended by PL 2025, c. 343, §8, is further amended
to read:
§12510. Permit to stock inland waters
1. Permit required. Except as otherwise authorized pursuant to this Part, a person
may not introduce fish or fish eggs gametes of any kind into any inland waters without a
valid permit issued under this section.
1-A. Penalty. A person who violates subsection 1 commits a Class E crime, except
that, notwithstanding Title 17‑A, section 1704, the fine may not be less than $1,000 or more
than $10,000.
1-B. Restitution. In the case of a person who violates subsection 1, the court shall:
A. Order that person to pay the department an amount equal to the cost of labor,
equipment, chemicals and all other related expenses directly associated with mitigating
or reclaiming waters affected as a result of the violation; and
Page 2 - 132LR2634(03)

B. Direct that person to provide the commissioner, upon making full payment as
ordered by the court under paragraph A, proof of that payment.
2. Issuance. The commissioner may issue a written permit allowing a person to
introduce fish or fish eggs gametes of any kind into any inland waters by means of live fish
or otherwise.
3. Limited permit. The commissioner may issue a written limited permit to a local
government under this subsection. A limited permit:
A. Allows the local government to introduce fish or fish eggs gametes only into a great
pond that:
(1) Is within the jurisdiction of the local government; and
(2) Was previously stocked by the department and in which stocking was
suspended prior to January 1, 2019 and has not been resumed by the department
due to inadequate public access;
B. Allows the introduction of only:
(1) The same species of fish that was stocked at the time the department suspended
stocking; and
(2) Fish or fish eggs gametes obtained by the local government at its own expense
from an in-state commercial facility that meets testing and health guidelines
approved by the department; and
C. May be issued only if the local government identifies public access to the great
pond that:
(1) Is at least suitable for the hand carrying of boats to the water;
(2) Includes a parking area; and
(3) Has been marked with signage adequate to ensure public awareness of the
public access.
For purposes of this subsection, "local government" means a municipality or, in the
unorganized territory, a county.
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §12511, as amended by PL 2025, c. 343, §9, is further amended
to read:
§12511. Permit to introduce fish or fish eggs gametes into private pond
1. Permit required. Except as otherwise authorized pursuant to this Part, a person
may not introduce fish or fish eggs gametes into a private pond without a valid permit
issued under this section.
1-A. Penalty. A person who violates subsection 1 commits a Class E crime, except
that, notwithstanding Title 17‑A, section 1704, the fine may not be less than $1,000 or more
than $10,000.
1-B. Restitution. In the case of a person who violates subsection 1, the court shall:
A. Order that person to pay the department an amount equal to the cost of labor,
equipment, chemicals and all other related expenses directly associated with mitigating
or reclaiming waters affected as a result of the violation; and
Page 3 - 132LR2634(03)

B. Direct that person to provide the commissioner, upon making full payment as
ordered by the court under paragraph A, proof of that payment.
2. Issuance. The commissioner may issue a written permit to introduce fish or fish
eggs gametes into a private pond.
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §12607, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2 and affected by
Pt. D, §7 and c. 614, §9, is amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§12607. Unlawfully introducing department-raised fish or fish spawn gametes
Sec. 6. 12 MRSA §12607, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by c. 614, §9, is amended to read:
1. Prohibition. A person may not introduce fish or fish spawn gametes raised by the
department into a private pond, unless the department permits the introduction for fishing
events held in conjunction with educational or special programs sanctioned by the
department.
Sec. 7. 12 MRSA §12663-B, sub-§4, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 132, §6, is
amended to read:
A. A person may not sell or offer for sale a lead sinker or unpainted lead jig that:
weighs one ounce or less or measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
Sec. 8. 12 MRSA §12664, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2025, c. 132, §7, is further
amended to read:
2. Unlawful use. This subsection governs the use of lead sinkers and lead jigs.
A. A person may not:
(3) Beginning September 1, 2026, use a painted lead jig.
A-1. A Prior to September 1, 2026, a person may not use a lead sinker or unpainted
lead jig that:
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
A-2. Beginning September 1, 2026, a person may not use a lead sinker or lead jig that:
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
B. A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for which a fine of
not less than $100 nor more than $500 may be adjudged.
C. A person who violates this subsection after having been adjudicated as having
committed 3 or more civil violations under this Part within the previous 5-year period
commits a Class E crime.
Page 4 - 132LR2634(03)